Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202660-1455
Recreational vehicle; certain model or line-make; sale of remaining inventory; authorized, when.

Notwithstanding any other provision of the Recreational Vehicle Industry Regulation Act, if any recreational vehicle of a model or line-make that is the subject of a termination agreement is not repurchased or required to be repurchased by the manufacturer or distributor, a dealer may sell the remaining inventory of such model or line-make or any accessory or part for such model or line-make that such dealer has in stock.

Laws 2026, LB972, § 14.
October 1, 2026